Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2649.01
Violation warning letter; contents.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that a violation of any provision of the Pesticide Act, any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, or any order of the director has occurred, the director may issue a violation warning letter. A violation warning letter shall specify all provisions of the act, rules and regulations, or order alleged to have been violated and the acts or omissions with which the person named in the violation warning letter is charged. A violation warning letter shall become final unless the person named in the violation warning letter, within twenty days after receiving the violation warning letter, requests a hearing before the director. Whenever a hearing is requested pursuant to this section, the director shall issue a notice of hearing as provided for in section 2-2649.02.

Laws 2002, LB 436, § 21.